District of Columbia statutes.
7-2231.07

Exercises.

The Agency shall coordinate a regular program of readiness exercises to test the District of Columbia’s emergency preparedness, propose action to address any gap in preparedness, and coordinate with regional, federal, and private entities.

Aug. 11, 1950, 64 Stat. 440, ch. 686, § 207
as added Mar. 14, 2007, D.C. Law 16-262, § 101(e), 54 DCR 794